District of Columbia statutes.
46-353.03

Application of law of the District.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a responding tribunal of the District shall:

(1)

Apply the procedural and substantive law generally applicable to similar proceedings originating in the District and may exercise all powers and provide all remedies available in those proceedings; and

(2)

Determine the duty of support and the amount payable in accordance with the law and support guidelines of the District.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 303, 63 DCR 222